Hawaii statutes.
§576B-303 Application of law of State.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a responding tribunal of this
State shall:

(1) Apply the procedural and substantive law
generally applicable to similar proceedings originating in this State and may exercise
all powers and provide all remedies available in those proceedings; and

(2) Determine the duty of support and the amount
payable in accordance with the law and support guidelines of this State. [L
1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next